Washington statutes.
RCW 10.73.110

Collateral attack—One year time limit—Duty of court to advise defendant.

At the time judgment and sentence is pronounced in a criminal case, the court shall advise the defendant of the time limit specified in RCW 10.73.090 and 10.73.100.

[ 1989 c 395 s 4.]